Illinois, session 104th, HB3723.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-170 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-170)7    Sec. 15-170. Senior citizens homestead exemption. 8    (a) An annual homestead exemption limited, except as 9described here with relation to cooperatives or life care 10facilities, to a maximum reduction set forth below from the 11property's value, as equalized or assessed by the Department, 12is granted for property that is occupied as a residence by a 13person 65 years of age or older who is liable for paying real 14estate taxes on the property and is an owner of record of the 15property or has a legal or equitable interest therein as 16evidenced by a written instrument, except for a leasehold 17interest, other than a leasehold interest of land on which a 18single family residence is located, which is occupied as a 19residence by a person 65 years or older who has an ownership 20interest therein, legal, equitable or as a lessee, and on 21which he or she is liable for the payment of property taxes. 22Before taxable year 2004, the maximum reduction shall be 23$2,500 in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and   HB3723- 2 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1$2,000 in all other counties. For taxable years 2004 through 22005, the maximum reduction shall be $3,000 in all counties. 3For taxable years 2006 and 2007, the maximum reduction shall 4be $3,500. For taxable years 2008 through 2011, the maximum 5reduction is $4,000 in all counties. For taxable year 2012, 6the maximum reduction is $5,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or 7more inhabitants and $4,000 in all other counties. For taxable 8years 2013 through 2016, the maximum reduction is $5,000 in 9all counties. For taxable years 2017 through 2022, the maximum 10reduction is $8,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants and $5,000 in all other counties. For taxable 12years 2023 and thereafter, the maximum reduction is $8,000 in 13counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and counties that 14are contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants 15and $5,000 in all other counties. 16    (b) For land improved with an apartment building owned and 17operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 18value of the property, as equalized by the Department, shall 19be multiplied by the number of apartments or units occupied by 20a person 65 years of age or older who is liable, by contract 21with the owner or owners of record, for paying property taxes 22on the property and is an owner of record of a legal or 23equitable interest in the cooperative apartment building, 24other than a leasehold interest. For land improved with a life 25care facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 26property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied   HB3723- 3 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1by the number of apartments or units occupied by persons 65 2years of age or older, irrespective of any legal, equitable, 3or leasehold interest in the facility, who are liable, under a 4contract with the owner or owners of record of the facility, 5for paying property taxes on the property. In a cooperative or 6a life care facility where a homestead exemption has been 7granted, the cooperative association or the management firm of 8the cooperative or facility shall credit the savings resulting 9from that exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of 10the owner or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any 11person who willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be 12guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. Under this Section and 13Sections 15-175, 15-176, and 15-177, "life care facility" 14means a facility, as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care 15Facilities Act, with which the applicant for the homestead 16exemption has a life care contract as defined in that Act.17    (c) When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 18Section and the person qualifying subsequently becomes a 19resident of a facility licensed under the Assisted Living and 20Shared Housing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 21Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community 22Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall continue so 23long as the residence continues to be occupied by the 24qualifying person's spouse if the spouse is 65 years of age or 25older, or if the residence remains unoccupied but is still 26owned by the person qualified for the homestead exemption.  HB3723- 4 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1    (d) A person who will be 65 years of age during the current 2assessment year shall be eligible to apply for the homestead 3exemption during that assessment year. Application shall be 4made during the application period in effect for the county of 5his residence.6    (e) Beginning with assessment year 2003, for taxes payable 7in 2004, property that is first occupied as a residence after 8January 1 of any assessment year by a person who is eligible 9for the senior citizens homestead exemption under this Section 10must be granted a pro-rata exemption for the assessment year. 11The amount of the pro-rata exemption is the exemption allowed 12in the county under this Section divided by 365 and multiplied 13by the number of days during the assessment year the property 14is occupied as a residence by a person eligible for the 15exemption under this Section. The chief county assessment 16officer must adopt reasonable procedures to establish 17eligibility for this pro-rata exemption.18    (f) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 19determine the eligibility of a life care facility to receive 20the benefits provided by this Section, by affidavit, 21application, visual inspection, questionnaire or other 22reasonable methods in order to ensure that the tax savings 23resulting from the exemption are credited by the management 24firm to the apportioned tax liability of each qualifying 25resident. The assessor may request reasonable proof that the 26management firm has so credited the exemption.  HB3723- 5 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1    (g) The chief county assessment officer of each county 2with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants shall provide to each 3person allowed a homestead exemption under this Section a form 4to designate any other person to receive a duplicate of any 5notice of delinquency in the payment of taxes assessed and 6levied under this Code on the property of the person receiving 7the exemption. The duplicate notice shall be in addition to 8the notice required to be provided to the person receiving the 9exemption, and shall be given in the manner required by this 10Code. The person filing the request for the duplicate notice 11shall pay a fee of $5 to cover administrative costs to the 12supervisor of assessments, who shall then file the executed 13designation with the county collector. Notwithstanding any 14other provision of this Code to the contrary, the filing of 15such an executed designation requires the county collector to 16provide duplicate notices as indicated by the designation. A 17designation may be rescinded by the person who executed such 18designation at any time, in the manner and form required by the 19chief county assessment officer.20    (h) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 21determine the eligibility of residential property to receive 22the homestead exemption provided by this Section by 23application, visual inspection, questionnaire or other 24reasonable methods. The determination shall be made in 25accordance with guidelines established by the Department.26    (i) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, for   HB3723- 6 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1taxable years 2010 through 2018, each taxpayer who has been 2granted an exemption under this Section must reapply on an 3annual basis. 4    If a reapplication is required, then the chief county 5assessment officer shall mail the application to the taxpayer 6at least 60 days prior to the last day of the application 7period for the county. 8    For taxable years 2019 and thereafter, in counties with 93,000,000 or more inhabitants, a taxpayer who has been granted 10an exemption under this Section need not reapply. However, if 11the property ceases to be qualified for the exemption under 12this Section in any year for which a reapplication is not 13required under this Section, then the owner of record of the 14property shall notify the chief county assessment officer that 15the property is no longer qualified. In addition, for taxable 16years 2019 and thereafter, the chief county assessment officer 17of a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants shall enter 18into an intergovernmental agreement with the county clerk of 19that county and the Department of Public Health, as well as any 20other appropriate governmental agency, to obtain information 21that documents the death of a taxpayer who has been granted an 22exemption under this Section. Notwithstanding any other 23provision of law, the county clerk and the Department of 24Public Health shall provide that information to the chief 25county assessment officer. The Department of Public Health 26shall supply this information no less frequently than every   HB3723- 7 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1calendar quarter. Information concerning the death of a 2taxpayer may be shared with the county treasurer. The chief 3county assessment officer shall also enter into a data 4exchange agreement with the Social Security Administration or 5its agent to obtain access to the information regarding deaths 6in possession of the Social Security Administration. The chief 7county assessment officer shall, subject to the notice 8requirements under subsection (m) of Section 9-275, terminate 9the exemption under this Section if the information obtained 10indicates that the property is no longer qualified for the 11exemption. In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the 12assessor and the county clerk shall establish policies and 13practices for the regular exchange of information for the 14purpose of alerting the assessor whenever the transfer of 15ownership of any property receiving an exemption under this 16Section has occurred. When such a transfer occurs, the 17assessor shall mail a notice to the new owner of the property 18(i) informing the new owner that the exemption will remain in 19place through the year of the transfer, after which it will be 20canceled, and (ii) providing information pertaining to the 21rules for reapplying for the exemption if the owner qualifies. 22In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the chief 23county assessment official shall conduct, by no later than 24December 31 of the first year of each reassessment cycle, as 25determined by Section 9-220, a review of all exemptions 26granted under this Section for the preceding reassessment   HB3723- 8 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1cycle under this Section. The review shall be designed to 2ascertain whether any senior homestead exemptions have been 3granted erroneously. If it is determined that a senior 4homestead exemption has been erroneously applied to a 5property, the chief county assessment officer shall make use 6of the appropriate provisions of Section 9-275 in relation to 7the property that received the erroneous homestead exemption. 8    (j) In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 9county board may by resolution provide that if a person has 10been granted a homestead exemption under this Section, the 11person qualifying need not reapply for the exemption. In 12counties in which the county board passes such a resolution, 13the chief county assessment official shall, prior to the 14submission of the final abstract for the first year of each 15reassessment cycle, as determined by Section 9-215, review all 16exemptions granted for the preceding reassessment cycle under 17this Section. The review shall be designed to ascertain 18whether any senior homestead exemptions have been granted 19erroneously. 20    In counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if the 21assessor or chief county assessment officer requires annual 22application for verification of eligibility for an exemption 23once granted under this Section, the application shall be 24mailed to the taxpayer.25    (l) The assessor or chief county assessment officer shall 26notify each person who qualifies for an exemption under this   HB3723- 9 -LRB104 03561 HLH 21331 b1Section that the person may also qualify for deferral of real 2estate taxes under the Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax 3Deferral Act. The notice shall set forth the qualifications 4needed for deferral of real estate taxes, the address and 5telephone number of county collector, and a statement that 6applications for deferral of real estate taxes may be obtained 7from the county collector.8    (l-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 9beginning in levy year 2026, the total tax bill for any 10property receiving an exemption under this Section may not 11exceed 101% of the tax bill for the immediately preceding 12taxable year. If the property's tax liability is reduced as a 13result of the provisions of this subsection, then the 14disbursements to each taxing district in which the property is 15located shall be reduced according to each taxing district's 16proportionate share of the property's total tax liability for 17the taxable year. 18    (m) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 19Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 20implementation of any mandate created by this Section.21(Source: P.A. 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25.)